trunk/incubator/apertium-en-lt.lt.dix
    <pardef n="autokel/ias__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ias</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>io</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iui</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ią</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yje</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iai</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ių</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iams</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ius</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iais</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iuose</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>isna</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iai</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="abejoto/jas__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jas</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jo</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jui</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ją</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ju</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jyje</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>juje</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>jy</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>jin</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jau</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jai</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jų</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jams</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jus</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jais</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>juose</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>jisna</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jai</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="abejokl/is__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>io</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iui</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>į</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yje</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iai</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ių</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iams</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ius</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iais</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iuose</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>isna</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iai</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="autokelias"><i>autokel</i><par n="autokel/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elnias"><i>eln</i><par n="autokel/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kelias"><i>kel</i><par n="autokel/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kurčias"><i>kurč</i><par n="autokel/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mulčias"><i>mulč</i><par n="autokel/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svečias"><i>sveč</i><par n="autokel/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vaikiščias"><i>vaikišč</i><par n="autokel/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="velnias"><i>veln</i><par n="autokel/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šalčias"><i>šalč</i><par n="autokel/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atradėjas"><i>atradė</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="biržytojas"><i>biržyto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="daugintojas"><i>dauginto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dresuotojas"><i>dresuoto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="emaliuotojas"><i>emaliuoto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gaivintojas"><i>gaivinto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="glituotojas"><i>glituoto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ieškotojas"><i>ieškoto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="juokautojas"><i>juokauto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="karšintojas"><i>karšinto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klijuotojas"><i>klijuoto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kūrentojas"><i>kūrento</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lojėjas"><i>lojė</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="margintojas"><i>marginto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mokytojas"><i>mokyto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nešiotojas"><i>nešioto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pamokslautojas"><i>pamokslauto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pašarautojas"><i>pašarauto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pikiruotojas"><i>pikiruoto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pokyliautojas"><i>pokyliauto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prižiūrėtojas"><i>prižiūrėto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="radijas"><i>radi</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="registruotojas"><i>registruoto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sakintojas"><i>sakinto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="siūlytojas"><i>siūlyto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="smaližiautojas"><i>smaližiauto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="streikuotojas"><i>streikuoto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="taikintojas"><i>taikinto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tuščiažodžiautojas"><i>tuščiažodžiauto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vaišintojas"><i>vaišinto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="velėtojas"><i>velėto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="įkainotojas"><i>įkainoto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žabotojas"><i>žaboto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antkelis"><i>antkel</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apiplyšėlis"><i>apiplyšėl</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atgrubnagis"><i>atgrubnag</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="autovežimėlis"><i>autovežimėl</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baris"><i>bar</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bobausis"><i>bobaus</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cipulis"><i>cipul</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="didžkukulis"><i>didžkukul</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dumblis"><i>dumbl</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elniaragis"><i>elniarag</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gegninis"><i>gegnin</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grožis"><i>grož</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ištvirkėlis"><i>ištvirkėl</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="karšis"><i>karš</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kotelis"><i>kotel</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ledlaukis"><i>ledlauk</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="miežis"><i>miež</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nešvankėlis"><i>nešvankėl</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="padalyvis"><i>padalyv</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="patrakėlis"><i>patrakėl</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="planeris"><i>planer</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prieauglis"><i>prieaugl</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pusdienis"><i>pusdien</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rauplėgrybis"><i>rauplėgryb</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="senelis"><i>senel</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="snaiperis"><i>snaiper</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="susitaikėlis"><i>susitaikėl</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tinklelis"><i>tinklel</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="užkimėlis"><i>užkimėl</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="velniaplaukis"><i>velniaplauk</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vynakmenis"><i>vynakmen</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šaltinis"><i>šaltin</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šėmmargis"><i>šėmmarg</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
